Washington statutes.
RCW 29A.04.510

Election administration and certification board—Generally.

(1) The Washington state election administration and certification board is established and has the responsibilities and authorities prescribed by this chapter. The board is composed of the following members:

(a) The secretary of state or the secretary's designee;

(b) The state director of elections or the director's designee;

(c) Four county auditors appointed by the Washington state association of county auditors or their alternates who are county auditors designated by the association to serve as such alternates, each appointee and alternate to serve at the pleasure of the association;

(d) One member from each of the two largest political party caucuses of the house of representatives designated by and serving at the pleasure of the legislative leader of the respective caucus;

(e) One member from each of the two largest political party caucuses of the senate designated by and serving at the pleasure of the legislative leader of the respective caucus; and

(f) One representative from each major political party, designated by and serving at the pleasure of the chair of the party's state central committee.

(2) The board shall elect a chair from among its number; however, neither the secretary of state nor the state director of elections nor their designees may serve as the chair of the board. A majority of the members appointed to the board constitutes a quorum for conducting the business of the board. Chapter 42.30 RCW, the Open Public Meetings Act, and RCW 42.30.035 regarding minutes of meetings, apply to the meetings of the board.

(3) Members of the board shall serve without compensation. The secretary of state shall reimburse members of the board, other than those who are members of the legislature, for travel expenses in accordance with RCW 43.03.050 and 43.03.060. Members of the board who are members of the legislature shall be reimbursed as provided in chapter 44.04 RCW.

[ 2017 3rd sp.s. c 25 s 31; 2003 c 111 s 149; 1992 c 163 s 3. Formerly RCW 29.60.010.]